Illinois, session 104th, SB2049.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Wildlife Code is amended by changing 5Section 3.1 as follows: 6    (520 ILCS 5/3.1)  (from Ch. 61, par. 3.1)7    Sec. 3.1. License and stamps required. 8    (a) Before any person shall take or attempt to take any of 9the species protected by Section 2.2 for which an open season 10is established under this Act, he shall first have procured 11and possess a valid hunting license, except as provided in 12Section 3.1-5 of this Code.13    Before any person 18 years of age or older shall take or 14attempt to take any bird of the species defined as migratory 15waterfowl by Section 2.2, including coots, he shall first have 16procured a State Migratory Waterfowl Stamp.17    Before any person 18 years of age or older takes, attempts 18to take, or pursues any species of wildlife protected by this 19Code, except migratory waterfowl, coots, and hand-reared birds 20on licensed game breeding and hunting preserve areas and state 21controlled pheasant hunting areas, he or she shall first 22obtain a State Habitat Stamp. Any person who obtained a 23lifetime license before January 1, 1993, shall not be required   SB2049- 2 -LRB104 10885 BDA 20967 b1to obtain State Habitat Stamps. Income from the sale of State 2Furbearer Stamps and State Pheasant Stamps received after the 3effective date of this amendatory Act of 1992 shall be 4deposited into the State Furbearer Fund and State Pheasant 5Fund, respectively.6    Before any person 18 years of age or older shall take, 7attempt to take, or sell the green hide of any mammal of the 8species defined as fur-bearing mammals by Section 2.2 for 9which an open season is established under this Act, he shall 10first have procured a State Habitat Stamp.11    (b) Before any person who is a non-resident of the State of 12Illinois shall take or attempt to take any of the species 13protected by Section 2.2 for which an open season is 14established under this Act, he shall, unless specifically 15exempted by law, first procure a non-resident license as 16provided by this Act for the taking of any wild game.17    Before a nonresident shall take or attempt to take 18white-tailed deer, he shall first have procured a Deer Hunting 19Permit as defined in Section 2.26 of this Code.20    Before a nonresident shall take or attempt to take wild 21turkeys, he shall have procured a Wild Turkey Hunting Permit 22as defined in Section 2.11 of this Code.23    (c) The owners residing on, or bona fide tenants of, farm 24lands and their children, parents, brothers, and sisters 25actually permanently residing on their lands shall have the 26right to hunt any of the species protected by Section 2.2 upon   SB2049- 3 -LRB104 10885 BDA 20967 b1their lands and waters without procuring hunting licenses; 2year-round but the hunting shall be done only during periods 3of time and with devices and by methods as are permitted by 4this Act. Any person on active duty with the Armed Forces of 5the United States who is now and who was at the time of 6entering the Armed Forces a resident of Illinois and who 7entered the Armed Forces from this State, and who is presently 8on ordinary or emergency leave from the Armed Forces, and any 9resident of Illinois who has a disability may hunt any of the 10species protected by Section 2.2 without procuring a hunting 11license, but the hunting shall be done only during such 12periods of time and with devices and by methods as are 13permitted by this Act. For the purpose of this Section a person 14is a person with a disability when that person has a Type 1 or 15Type 4, Class 2 disability as defined in Section 4A of the 16Illinois Identification Card Act. For purposes of this 17Section, an Illinois Person with a Disability Identification 18Card issued pursuant to the Illinois Identification Card Act 19indicating that the person named has a Type 1 or Type 4, Class 202 disability shall be adequate documentation of the 21disability.22    (d) A courtesy non-resident license, permit, or stamp for 23taking game may be issued at the discretion of the Director, 24without fee, to any person officially employed in the game and 25fish or conservation department of another state or of the 26United States who is within the State to assist or consult or   SB2049- 4 -LRB104 10885 BDA 20967 b1cooperate with the Director; or to the officials of other 2states, the United States, foreign countries, or officers or 3representatives of conservation organizations or publications 4while in the State as guests of the Governor or Director. The 5Director may provide to nonresident participants and official 6gunners at field trials an exemption from licensure while 7participating in a field trial.8    (e) State Migratory Waterfowl Stamps shall be required for 9those persons qualifying under subsections (c) and (d) who 10intend to hunt migratory waterfowl, including coots, to the 11extent that hunting licenses of the various types are 12authorized and required by this Section for those persons.13    (f) Registration in the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Migratory 14Bird Harvest Information Program shall be required for those 15persons who are required to have a hunting license before 16taking or attempting to take any bird of the species defined as 17migratory game birds by Section 2.2, except that this 18subsection shall not apply to crows in this State or 19hand-reared birds on licensed game breeding and hunting 20preserve areas, for which an open season is established by 21this Act. Persons registering with the Program must carry 22proof of registration with them while migratory bird hunting.23    The Department shall publish suitable prescribed 24regulations pertaining to registration by the migratory bird 25hunter in the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service Migratory Bird 26Harvest Information Program.  SB2049- 5 -LRB104 10885 BDA 20967 b1(Source: P.A. 102-837, eff. 5-13-22.)